Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
180C]

SOIL
EROSION AND SEDIMENT CONTROL

Section

180C-1 Definitions

180C-2 Erosion and sediment control

180C-3 Limitation of enactment of ordinances

180C-4 Department of health

Note

L 2014, c 218, §8
purports to amend this chapter.

Department of transportation's bridge rehabilitation and
replacement program; temporary exemption from certain construction requirements
of this chapter through June 30, 2017 or until completion. L 2012, c 218.

Cross References

Environmental courts,
jurisdiction over proceedings arising under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Case Notes

The public trust
duties imposed on the State under article XI, §1 of the Hawaii constitution
also applied to the county, as a political subdivision of the State; article
XI, §1 mandates that the county has an obligation to conserve and protect the
State's natural resources; the county's power under the general laws with
respect to its public trust duty to protect the natural resources of the State
can be found in this chapter; thus, the county had a duty to protect the waters
located adjacent to defendant's property. 111 H. 205, 140 P.3d 985.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next